Florida, session 2026, HB7013.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (5) of section 319.1414, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
319.1414 Department-authorized private rebuilt inspection
providers; investigations; examinations; proceedings; subpoenas
and other process; witnesses; oaths; rules.—
(5) Information received by the department as a result of
an investigation or examination conducted pursuant to this
section is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until the investigation
or examination ceases to be active or administrative action
taken by the department has concluded or been made part of a
hearing or court proceeding. The department may release
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7013-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7013 2026
information that is made confidential and exempt under this
subsection in furtherance of its official duties and
responsibilities or, if released to another governmental agency,
in the furtherance of that agency's official duties and
responsibilities. This subsection is subject to the Open
Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and
shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and
saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. Subsection (7) of section 319.25, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
319.25 Cancellation of certificates; investigations;
examinations; proceedings; subpoenas and other process;
witnesses; oaths; rules.—
(7) Information received by the department as a result of
an investigation or examination conducted pursuant to this
section is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until the investigation
or examination ceases to be active or administrative action
taken by the department has concluded or been made part of a
hearing or court proceeding. The department may release
information that is made confidential and exempt under this
subsection in furtherance of its official duties and
responsibilities or, if released to another governmental agency,
in the furtherance of that agency's official duties and
responsibilities. This subsection is subject to the Open
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7013-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7013 2026
Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and
shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and
saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 3. Subsection (5) of section 320.861, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
320.861 Investigations; subpoenas and other process;
oaths; rules.—
(5) Information received by the department as a result of
an investigation or examination conducted pursuant to this
section is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until the investigation
or examination ceases to be active or administrative action
taken by the department has concluded or been made part of a
hearing or court proceeding. The department may release
information that is made confidential and exempt under this
subsection in furtherance of its official duties and
responsibilities or, if released to another governmental agency,
in the furtherance of that agency's official duties and
responsibilities. This subsection is subject to the Open
Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and
shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and
saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 4. Subsection (5) of section 322.71, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
322.71 Investigations; examinations; proceedings;
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7013-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7013 2026
subpoenas and other process; witnesses; oaths; rules.—
(5) Information received by the department as a result of
an investigation or examination conducted pursuant to this
section is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until the investigation
or examination ceases to be active or administrative action
taken by the department has concluded or been made part of a
hearing or court proceeding. The department may release
information that is made confidential and exempt under this
subsection in furtherance of its official duties and
responsibilities or, if released to another governmental agency,
in the furtherance of that agency's official duties and
responsibilities. This subsection is subject to the Open
Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and
shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and
saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 5. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7013-00